Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 25. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Cross references. —

For enforcement of support obligations determined in other states, see AS

25.27.022

.

For provision providing legislative findings and intent, see sec. 1, ch. 32, SLA 2015.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 103, ch. 32, SLA 2015, the 2015 amendments to this chapter made by ch. 32, SLA 2015 apply to proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2015, “to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 57, SLA 1995 (CSSB 115(FIN)am), which enacted the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see 1995 Senate Journal 517. For legislative letter of intent on the same legislation, see 1995 Senate Journal 1405 and 1494 and 1995 House Journal 1996.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 32, SLA 2015 (CSHB 106(STA) am), which amended the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see 2015 House Journal 192 — 194.

Secs. 25.25.010 — 25.25.100.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 57 SLA 1995.]